Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.092

Deposit of surplus balance investment earnings—Treasury income account—Accounts and funds credited. (Effective until July 1, 2028.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5801-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1878-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1392-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1596-S.SL) ***

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the ambulance transport fund, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

[ 2024 c 210 s 4; 2024 c 168 s 12. Prior: 2023 c 435 s 14; (2023 c 435 s 13 expired July 1, 2024); 2023 c 431 s 10; (2023 c 431 s 9 expired July 1, 2024); 2023 c 389 s 10; (2023 c 389 s 9 expired July 1, 2024); 2023 c 377 s 7; (2023 c 377 s 6 expired July 1, 2024); 2023 c 340 s 10; (2023 c 340 s 9 expired July 1, 2024); 2023 c 110 s 3; (2023 c 110 s 2 expired July 1, 2024); 2023 c 73 s 10; (2023 c 73 s 9 expired July 1, 2024); 2023 c 41 s 4; (2023 c 41 s 3 expired July 1, 2024); 2022 c 182 s 404; (2022 c 182 s 403 expired July 1, 2024); (2021 c 199 s 504 expired July 1, 2024); (2021 c 199 s 503 expired July 1, 2021); prior: 2020 c 354 s 11; 2020 c 221 s 5; 2020 c 148 s 3; 2020 c 103 s 7; 2020 c 18 s 3; prior: 2019 c 421 s 15; 2019 c 403 s 14; 2019 c 365 s 19; 2019 c 287 s 19; 2019 c 95 s 6; prior: 2018 c 287 s 7; 2018 c 275 s 10; 2018 c 203 s 14; prior: 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 50; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 12; 2017 c 290 s 8; prior: 2016 c 194 s 5; 2016 c 161 s 20; 2016 c 112 s 4; prior: 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 107; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3; prior: 2014 c 112 s 106; 2014 c 74 s 5; 2014 c 32 s 6; prior: 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 24; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 15; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 15; prior: 2013 c 251 s 3; 2013 c 96 s 3; 2012 c 198 s 2; 2012 c 196 s 7; 2012 c 187 s 14; 2012 c 83 s 4; prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6; 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 22; 2011 c 369 s 6; 2011 c 339 s 1; 2011 c 311 s 9; 2011 c 272 s 3; 2011 c 120 s 3; 2011 c 83 s 7; prior: 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20; 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 7; 2010 c 248 s 6; 2010 c 222 s 5; 2010 c 162 s 6; 2010 c 145 s 11; prior: 2009 c 479 s 31; 2009 c 472 s 5; 2009 c 451 s 8; (2009 c 451 s 7 expired July 1, 2009); prior: 2008 c 128 s 19; 2008 c 106 s 4; (2008 c 106 s 3 expired July 1, 2009); (2008 c 106 s 2 expired July 1, 2008); prior: 2007 c 514 s 3; 2007 c 513 s 1; 2007 c 484 s 4; 2007 c 356 s 9; prior: 2006 c 337 s 11; (2006 c 337 s 10 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 311 s 23; (2006 c 311 s 22 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 171 s 10; (2006 c 171 s 9 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 56 s 10; (2006 c 56 s 9 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 6 s 8; prior: 2005 c 514 s 1106; 2005 c 353 s 4; 2005 c 339 s 23; 2005 c 314 s 110; 2005 c 312 s 8; 2005 c 94 s 2; 2005 c 83 s 5; prior: (2005 c 353 s 2 expired July 1, 2005); 2004 c 242 s 60; prior: 2003 c 361 s 602; 2003 c 324 s 1; 2003 c 150 s 2; 2003 c 48 s 2; prior: 2002 c 242 s 2; 2002 c 114 s 24; 2002 c 56 s 402; prior: 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608; (2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 607 expired March 1, 2002); 2001 c 273 s 6; (2001 c 273 s 5 expired March 1, 2002); 2001 c 141 s 3; (2001 c 141 s 2 expired March 1, 2002); 2001 c 80 s 5; (2001 c 80 s 4 expired March 1, 2002); 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6; prior: 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5; (2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 3, 4 expired September 1, 2000); 2000 c 247 s 702; 2000 c 79 s 39; (2000 c 79 ss 37, 38 expired September 1, 2000); prior: 1999 c 380 s 9; 1999 c 380 s 8; 1999 c 309 s 929; (1999 c 309 s 928 expired September 1, 2000); 1999 c 268 s 5; (1999 c 268 s 4 expired September 1, 2000); 1999 c 94 s 4; (1999 c 94 ss 2, 3 expired September 1, 2000); 1998 c 341 s 708; 1997 c 218 s 5; 1996 c 262 s 4; prior: 1995 c 394 s 1; 1995 c 122 s 12; prior: 1994 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 601, approved November 2, 1993); 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 511; 1993 sp.s. c 8 s 1; 1993 c 500 s 6; 1993 c 492 s 473; 1993 c 445 s 4; 1993 c 329 s 2; 1993 c 4 s 9; 1992 c 235 s 4; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 57; 1990 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 204; 1989 c 419 s 12; 1985 c 57 s 51.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 168 s 12 and by 2024 c 210 s 4, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Expiration date—2024 c 210 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires July 1, 2028." [ 2024 c 210 s 6.]

Effective dates—Findings—Intent—2024 c 210: See notes following RCW 43.79.484.

Effective dates—2024 c 168 ss 4-13: See note following RCW 41.05.155.

Expiration dates—2024 c 168 ss 10 and 12: See note following RCW 43.79A.040.

Expiration date—2023 c 435 s 13: "Section 13 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 435 s 16.]

Effective date—2023 c 435 s 14: "Section 14 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 435 s 17.]

Effective date—2023 c 435: See note following RCW 43.79.570.

Expiration date—2023 c 431 s 9: "Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 431 s 17.]

Effective date—2023 c 431 s 10: "Section 10 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 431 s 18.]

Intent—2023 c 431: See note following RCW 46.17.015.

Expiration date—2023 c 389 s 9: "Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 389 s 11.]

Effective date—2023 c 389 s 10: "Section 10 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 389 s 12.]

Expiration date—2023 c 377 s 6: "Section 6 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 377 s 11.]

Effective date—2023 c 377 s 7: "Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 377 s 12.]

Finding—2023 c 377: See note following RCW 47.56.902.

Expiration date—2023 c 340 s 9: "Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 340 s 16.]

Effective date—2023 c 340 s 10: "Section 10 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 340 s 17.]

Short title—Conflict with federal requirements—2023 c 340: See notes following RCW 43.181.040.

Effective date—2023 c 110 s 2: "Section 2 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 110 s 14.]

Expiration date—2023 c 110 s 2: "Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 110 s 15.]

Effective date—2023 c 110 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 110 s 16.]

Contingent expiration date—Expiration date—2023 c 73 ss 6 and 9: See note following RCW 41.24.030.

Contingent effective date—Effective date—2023 c 73 ss 7 and 10: See note following RCW 41.24.030.

Finding—Intent—2023 c 73: See note following RCW 41.24.800.

Expiration date—2023 c 41 s 3: "Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 41 s 7.]

Effective dates—2023 c 41: "(1) Except for sections 4 and 5 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023.

(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

(3) Section 5 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 6, 2023]." [ 2023 c 41 s 6.]

Expiration date—2024 c 310; 2022 c 182 s 403: "Section 403 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2024 c 310 s 611; 2022 c 182 s 503.]

Intent—Effective date—2022 c 182: See notes following RCW 70A.65.240.

Expiration date—2021 c 199 s 503: "Section 503 of this act expires July 1, 2021." [ 2021 c 199 s 606.]

Expiration date—2021 c 199 s 504: "Section 504 of this act expires July 1, 2024." [ 2021 c 199 s 608.]

Effective date—2021 c 199 ss 105 and 503: See note following RCW 83.100.230.

Effective date—2021 c 199 ss 201, 202, 301, 309, and 504: See note following RCW 43.216.802.

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.

Effective date—Expiration date—2020 c 354: See RCW 74.70.900 and 74.70.901.

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 148: See notes following RCW 77.12.170.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 103: See notes following RCW 28B.10.423.

Explanatory statement—2020 c 18: See note following RCW 43.79A.040.

Intent—Effective date—2019 c 421: See notes following RCW 47.10.896.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2019 c 403: See notes following RCW 46.04.071.

Findings—2019 c 365: See note following RCW 43.330.532.

Effective date—2019 c 287: See note following RCW 82.29A.125.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 287: See note following RCW 28B.30.903.

Intent—2019 c 95: See note following RCW 70A.305.170.

Findings—Implementation—Effective date—2018 c 287: See notes following RCW 46.55.400.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 203: See note following RCW 28B.85.095.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.

Contingent expiration date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 107: "Section 107 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 429.]

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.

Contingent expiration date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3: "Section 3 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 5.]

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 12: See note following RCW 47.01.480.

Contingent expiration date—2014 c 112 s 106: "Section 106 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2014 c 112 s 501.]

Contingent expiration date—2014 c 74 s 5: "Section 5 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2014 c 74 s 9.]

Contingent expiration date—2014 c 32 s 6: "Section 6 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2014 c 32 s 8.]

Contingent expiration date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 24: "Section 24 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 29.]

Finding—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 23: See note following RCW 46.09.442.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 23: See note following RCW 46.09.310.

Contingent expiration date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 15: "Section 15 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 17.]

Contingent expiration date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 15: "Section 15 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 17.]

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 1: See notes following RCW 70A.305.020.

Contingent expiration date—2013 c 251 s 3: "Section 3 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 c 251 s 15.]

Residual balance of funds—Effective date—2013 c 251: See notes following RCW 41.06.280.

Contingent expiration date—2013 c 96 s 3: "Section 3 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 c 96 s 5.]

Effective date—2012 c 198: See note following RCW 70A.15.5110.

Finding—Intent—2012 c 83: See note following RCW 47.56.862.

Finding—Contingent effective date—Notice of certification and toll rate agreements—2012 c 36: See notes following RCW 47.56.810.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 16 ss 1-15: See note following RCW 47.60.530.

Purpose—Findings—Intent—Severability—Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 7: See RCW 74.48.005, 74.48.900, and 74.48.901.

Intent—2011 c 369: See note following RCW 47.56.880.

Effective date—2011 c 339: "Sections 1 through 4 and 6 through 38 of this act take effect September 1, 2011." [ 2011 c 339 s 39.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.650.035.

Intent—2010 c 222: See note following RCW 43.08.150.

Effective date—2010 c 162: See note following RCW 43.42.090.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Intent—Effective date—2009 c 472: See notes following RCW 47.56.870.

Effective date—2009 c 451 s 8: "Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 451 s 9.]

Expiration dates—2009 c 451 ss 2, 3, 5, 6, and 7: "(1) Sections 2, 3, 5, and 6 of this act expire June 30, 2016.

(2) Section 7 of this act expires July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 451 s 10.]

Effective date—Intent—2009 c 451: See notes following RCW 43.325.030.

Effective date—2008 c 128 ss 17-20: See note following RCW 88.16.061.

Expiration dates—2008 c 106 ss 2 and 3: "(1) Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2008.

(2) Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 106 s 5.]

Effective dates—2008 c 106 ss 3 and 4: "(1) Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2008.

(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 106 s 6.]

Effective date—2007 c 513: "This act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2007 c 513 s 2.]

Contingent effective date—2007 c 484 ss 2-8: See note following RCW 43.79.495.

Short title—2007 c 356: See note following RCW 74.31.005.

Effective date—2006 c 337 s 11: "Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 337 s 14.]

Expiration date—2006 c 337 s 10: "Section 10 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 337 s 13.]

Effective date—2006 c 311 s 23: "Section 23 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 311 s 31.]

Expiration date—2006 c 311 s 22: "Section 22 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 311 s 30.]

Findings—2006 c 311: See note following RCW 36.120.020.

Expiration date—2006 c 171 s 9: "Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 171 s 14.]

Effective date—2006 c 171 ss 8 and 10: See note following RCW 42.56.270.

Expiration date—2006 c 56 s 9: "Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 56 s 11.]

Effective dates—2006 c 56: See note following RCW 41.45.230.

Effective date—2006 c 6: See RCW 90.90.900.

Effective date—2005 c 514 s 1106: "Section 1106 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 514 s 1313.]

Part headings not law—Severability—2005 c 514: See notes following RCW 82.12.808.

Effective dates—2005 c 353: See note following RCW 71A.20.170.

Effective date—2005 c 339 s 23: "Section 23 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 339 s 25.]

Effective dates—2005 c 314 ss 110 and 201-206: See note following RCW 46.68.035.

Part headings not law—2005 c 314: See note following RCW 46.68.035.

Effective dates—2005 c 312 ss 6 and 8: "(1) Section 6 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2005.

(2) Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 312 s 11.]

Intent—Captions—2005 c 312: See notes following RCW 47.56.401.

Effective dates—2005 c 94: "(1) Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2005.

(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 94 s 3.]

Findings—Effective dates—2005 c 83: See notes following RCW 47.26.340.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Findings—2003 c 361: See note following RCW 82.38.030.

Effective dates—2003 c 361: See note following RCW 82.08.020.

Effective date—2003 c 150 ss 2 and 3: "Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2005." [ 2003 c 150 s 4.]

Findings—Intent—2003 c 150; 2002 c 242: "The legislature finds that the community economic revitalization board plays a valuable and unique role in stimulating and diversifying local economies, attracting private investment, creating new jobs, and generating additional state and local tax revenues by investing in public facilities projects that result in new or expanded economic development. The legislature also finds that it is in the best interest of the state and local communities to secure a stable and dedicated source of funds for the community economic revitalization board. It is the intent of the legislature to establish an ongoing funding source for the community economic revitalization board that will be used exclusively to advance economic development infrastructure. This act provides a partial funding solution by directing that beginning July 1, 2005, the interest earnings generated by the public works assistance account shall be used to fund the community economic revitalization board's financial assistance programs. These funds are not for use other than for the stated purpose and goals of the community economic revitalization board." [ 2003 c 150 s 1; 2002 c 242 s 1.]

Effective date—2003 c 48: See note following RCW 29A.04.440.

Finding—Intent—2002 c 114: See RCW 47.46.011.

Captions not law—2002 c 114: See note following RCW 47.46.011.

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608: "Section 608 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 611.]

Expiration date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 607: "Section 607 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 610.]

Severability—Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 47.04.210.

Effective date—2001 c 273 s 6: "Section 6 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 273 s 8.]

Expiration date—2001 c 273 s 5: "Section 5 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 273 s 7.]

Effective date—2001 c 141 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 141 s 6.]

Expiration date—2001 c 141 s 2: "Section 2 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 141 s 5.]

Purpose—2001 c 141: "This act is needed to comply with federal law, which is the source of funds in the drinking water assistance account, used to fund the Washington state drinking water loan program as part of the federal safe drinking water act." [ 2001 c 141 s 1.]

Effective date—2001 c 80 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 80 s 7.]

Expiration date—2001 c 80 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 80 s 6.]

Findings—Intent—2001 c 80: See note following RCW 43.70.040.

Expiration date—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 3 and 4: "Sections 3 and 4 of this act expire September 1, 2000." [ 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 37.]

Effective date—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 1-3 and 20: See note following RCW 82.08.020.

Effective dates—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 4-10: See note following RCW 43.89.010.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Expiration date—2000 c 79 ss 37 and 38: "Sections 37 and 38 of this act expire September 1, 2000." [ 2000 c 79 s 49.]

Effective dates—2000 c 79 ss 26, 38, and 39: See note following RCW 48.43.041.

Severability—2000 c 79: See note following RCW 48.04.010.

Effective date—1999 c 380: See RCW 43.99P.901.

Expiration date—1999 c 309 s 928: "Section 928 of this act expires September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 309 s 930.]

Effective dates—1999 c 309 ss 927-929, 931, and 1101-1902: See note following RCW 43.79.480.

Severability—1999 c 309: See note following RCW 41.06.152.

Effective date—1999 c 268 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 268 s 7.]

Expiration date—1999 c 268 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 268 s 6.]

Expiration date—1999 c 94 ss 2 and 3: "Sections 2 and 3 of this act expire September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 94 s 36.]

Legislative finding—1999 c 94: "The legislature finds that a periodic review of the accounts and their uses is necessary. While creating new accounts may facilitate the implementation of legislative intent, the creation of too many accounts limits the effectiveness of performance-based budgeting. Too many accounts also limit the flexibility of the legislature to address emerging and changing issues in addition to creating administrative burdens for the responsible agencies. Accounts created for specific purposes may no longer be valid or needed. Accordingly, this act eliminates accounts that are not in use or are unneeded and consolidates accounts that are similar in nature." [ 1999 c 94 s 1.]

Effective dates—1999 c 94: "(1) Sections 1, 2, 5 through 24, 29 through 31, and 33 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1999.

(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

(3) Sections 32 and 37 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect June 30, 1999.

(4) Sections 3, 25 through 28, and 34 of this act take effect July 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 94 s 35.]

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Findings—Effective date—1997 c 218: See notes following RCW 70A.120.030.

Transportation infrastructure account—Highway infrastructure account—Finding—Intent—Purpose—1996 c 262: See RCW 82.44.195.

Effective date—1996 c 262: See note following RCW 82.44.190.

Effective date—1995 c 394: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 394 s 3.]

Declaration—Intent—Purpose—1995 c 122: See RCW 59.21.006.

Effective date—1995 c 122: See RCW 59.21.905.

Severability—Effective dates—Part headings, captions not law—1993 sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 82.04.230.

Findings—Intent—1993 sp.s. c 25: See note following RCW 82.45.010.

Effective date—Application—1993 sp.s. c 8: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1993, but shall not be effective for earnings on balances prior to July 1, 1993." [ 1993 sp.s. c 8 s 3.]

Finding—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 500: See notes following RCW 43.41.180.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.

Effective date—1993 c 329: See note following RCW 90.50A.020.

Legislative declaration—Effective date—1993 c 4: See notes following RCW 47.56.770.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Applicability—1990 2nd ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 82.14.050.

Severability—1990 2nd ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 82.14.300.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.

PDFRCW 43.84.092

Deposit of surplus balance investment earnings—Treasury income account—Accounts and funds credited. (Effective July 1, 2028.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5801-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1468-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1878-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1392-S.SL) ***

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1596-S.SL) ***

(1) All earnings of investments of surplus balances in the state treasury shall be deposited to the treasury income account, which account is hereby established in the state treasury.

(2) The treasury income account shall be utilized to pay or receive funds associated with federal programs as required by the federal cash management improvement act of 1990. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for refunds or allocations of interest earnings required by the cash management improvement act. Refunds of interest to the federal treasury required under the cash management improvement act fall under RCW 43.88.180 and shall not require appropriation. The office of financial management shall determine the amounts due to or from the federal government pursuant to the cash management improvement act. The office of financial management may direct transfers of funds between accounts as deemed necessary to implement the provisions of the cash management improvement act, and this subsection. Refunds or allocations shall occur prior to the distributions of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(3) Except for the provisions of RCW 43.84.160, the treasury income account may be utilized for the payment of purchased banking services on behalf of treasury funds including, but not limited to, depository, safekeeping, and disbursement functions for the state treasury and affected state agencies. The treasury income account is subject in all respects to chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for payments to financial institutions. Payments shall occur prior to distribution of earnings set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

(4) Monthly, the state treasurer shall distribute the earnings credited to the treasury income account. The state treasurer shall credit the general fund with all the earnings credited to the treasury income account except:

(a) The following accounts and funds shall receive their proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's and fund's average daily balance for the period: The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account, the aeronautics account, the Alaskan Way viaduct replacement project account, the budget stabilization account, the capital vessel replacement account, the capitol building construction account, the Central Washington University capital projects account, the charitable, educational, penal and reformatory institutions account, the Chehalis basin account, the Chehalis basin taxable account, the clean fuels credit account, the clean fuels transportation investment account, the cleanup settlement account, the climate active transportation account, the climate transit programs account, the Columbia river basin water supply development account, the Columbia river basin taxable bond water supply development account, the Columbia river basin water supply revenue recovery account, the common school construction fund, the community forest trust account, the connecting Washington account, the county arterial preservation account, the county criminal justice assistance account, the covenant homeownership account, the deferred compensation administrative account, the deferred compensation principal account, the department of licensing services account, the department of retirement systems expense account, the developmental disabilities community services account, the diesel idle reduction account, the opioid abatement settlement account, the drinking water assistance account, the administrative subaccount of the drinking water assistance account, the early learning facilities development account, the early learning facilities revolving account, the Eastern Washington University capital projects account, the education construction fund, the education legacy trust account, the election account, the electric vehicle account, the energy freedom account, the energy recovery act account, the essential rail assistance account, The Evergreen State College capital projects account, the fair start for kids account, the family medicine workforce development account, the ferry bond retirement fund, the fish, wildlife, and conservation account, the freight mobility investment account, the freight mobility multimodal account, the grade crossing protective fund, the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund, the Washington student loan account, the highway bond retirement fund, the highway infrastructure account, the highway safety fund, the hospital safety net assessment fund, the Interstate 5 bridge replacement project account, the Interstate 405 and state route number 167 express toll lanes account, the judges' retirement account, the judicial retirement administrative account, the judicial retirement principal account, the limited fish and wildlife account, the local leasehold excise tax account, the local real estate excise tax account, the local sales and use tax account, the marine resources stewardship trust account, the medical aid account, the money-purchase retirement savings administrative account, the money-purchase retirement savings principal account, the motor vehicle fund, the motorcycle safety education account, the move ahead WA account, the move ahead WA flexible account, the multimodal transportation account, the multiuse roadway safety account, the municipal criminal justice assistance account, the oyster reserve land account, the pension funding stabilization account, the perpetual surveillance and maintenance account, the pilotage account, the pollution liability insurance agency underground storage tank revolving account, the public employees' retirement system plan 1 account, the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the public facilities construction loan revolving account, the public health supplemental account, the public works assistance account, the Puget Sound capital construction account, the Puget Sound ferry operations account, the Puget Sound Gateway facility account, the Puget Sound taxpayer accountability account, the real estate appraiser commission account, the recreational vehicle account, the regional mobility grant program account, the reserve officers' relief and pension principal fund, the resource management cost account, the rural arterial trust account, the rural mobility grant program account, the rural Washington loan fund, the second injury fund, the sexual assault prevention and response account, the site closure account, the skilled nursing facility safety net trust fund, the small city pavement and sidewalk account, the special category C account, the special wildlife account, the state hazard mitigation revolving loan account, the state investment board expense account, the state investment board commingled trust fund accounts, the state patrol highway account, the state reclamation revolving account, the state route number 520 civil penalties account, the state route number 520 corridor account, the statewide broadband account, the statewide tourism marketing account, the supplemental pension account, the Tacoma Narrows toll bridge account, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 account, the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 account, the tobacco prevention and control account, the tobacco settlement account, the toll facility bond retirement account, the transportation 2003 account (nickel account), the transportation equipment fund, the JUDY transportation future funding program account, the transportation improvement account, the transportation improvement board bond retirement account, the transportation infrastructure account, the transportation partnership account, the traumatic brain injury account, the tribal opioid prevention and treatment account, the University of Washington bond retirement fund, the University of Washington building account, the voluntary cleanup account, the volunteer firefighters' relief and pension principal fund, the volunteer firefighters' and reserve officers' administrative fund, the vulnerable roadway user education account, the Washington judicial retirement system account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement account, the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement account, the Washington public safety employees' plan 2 retirement account, the Washington school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 account, the Washington state patrol retirement account, the Washington State University building account, the Washington State University bond retirement fund, the water pollution control revolving administration account, the water pollution control revolving fund, the Western Washington University capital projects account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation account, the Yakima integrated plan implementation revenue recovery account, and the Yakima integrated plan implementation taxable bond account. Earnings derived from investing balances of the agricultural permanent fund, the normal school permanent fund, the permanent common school fund, the scientific permanent fund, and the state university permanent fund shall be allocated to their respective beneficiary accounts.

(b) Any state agency that has independent authority over accounts or funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury that deposits funds into a fund or account in the state treasury pursuant to an agreement with the office of the state treasurer shall receive its proportionate share of earnings based upon each account's or fund's average daily balance for the period.

(5) In conformance with Article II, section 37 of the state Constitution, no treasury accounts or funds shall be allocated earnings without the specific affirmative directive of this section.

[ 2024 c 210 s 5; 2024 c 168 s 13. Prior: 2023 c 435 s 14; 2023 c 431 s 10; 2023 c 389 s 10; 2023 c 377 s 7; 2023 c 340 s 10; 2023 c 110 s 3; 2023 c 73 s 10; 2023 c 41 s 4; 2022 c 182 s 404; 2021 c 199 s 505; prior: 2020 c 221 s 5; 2020 c 148 s 3; 2020 c 103 s 7; 2020 c 18 s 3; prior: 2019 c 421 s 15; 2019 c 403 s 14; 2019 c 365 s 19; 2019 c 287 s 19; 2019 c 95 s 6; prior: 2018 c 287 s 7; 2018 c 275 s 10; 2018 c 203 s 14; prior: 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 50; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 12; 2017 c 290 s 8; prior: 2016 c 194 s 5; 2016 c 161 s 20; 2016 c 112 s 4; prior: 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 107; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3; prior: 2014 c 112 s 106; 2014 c 74 s 5; 2014 c 32 s 6; prior: 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 24; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 15; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 15; prior: 2013 c 251 s 3; 2013 c 96 s 3; 2012 c 198 s 2; 2012 c 196 s 7; 2012 c 187 s 14; 2012 c 83 s 4; prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 16 s 6; 2011 1st sp.s. c 7 s 22; 2011 c 369 s 6; 2011 c 339 s 1; 2011 c 311 s 9; 2011 c 272 s 3; 2011 c 120 s 3; 2011 c 83 s 7; prior: 2010 1st sp.s. c 30 s 20; 2010 1st sp.s. c 9 s 7; 2010 c 248 s 6; 2010 c 222 s 5; 2010 c 162 s 6; 2010 c 145 s 11; prior: 2009 c 479 s 31; 2009 c 472 s 5; 2009 c 451 s 8; (2009 c 451 s 7 expired July 1, 2009); prior: 2008 c 128 s 19; 2008 c 106 s 4; (2008 c 106 s 3 expired July 1, 2009); (2008 c 106 s 2 expired July 1, 2008); prior: 2007 c 514 s 3; 2007 c 513 s 1; 2007 c 484 s 4; 2007 c 356 s 9; prior: 2006 c 337 s 11; (2006 c 337 s 10 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 311 s 23; (2006 c 311 s 22 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 171 s 10; (2006 c 171 s 9 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 56 s 10; (2006 c 56 s 9 expired July 1, 2006); 2006 c 6 s 8; prior: 2005 c 514 s 1106; 2005 c 353 s 4; 2005 c 339 s 23; 2005 c 314 s 110; 2005 c 312 s 8; 2005 c 94 s 2; 2005 c 83 s 5; prior: (2005 c 353 s 2 expired July 1, 2005); 2004 c 242 s 60; prior: 2003 c 361 s 602; 2003 c 324 s 1; 2003 c 150 s 2; 2003 c 48 s 2; prior: 2002 c 242 s 2; 2002 c 114 s 24; 2002 c 56 s 402; prior: 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608; (2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 607 expired March 1, 2002); 2001 c 273 s 6; (2001 c 273 s 5 expired March 1, 2002); 2001 c 141 s 3; (2001 c 141 s 2 expired March 1, 2002); 2001 c 80 s 5; (2001 c 80 s 4 expired March 1, 2002); 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 6; prior: 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 5; (2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 3, 4 expired September 1, 2000); 2000 c 247 s 702; 2000 c 79 s 39; (2000 c 79 ss 37, 38 expired September 1, 2000); prior: 1999 c 380 s 9; 1999 c 380 s 8; 1999 c 309 s 929; (1999 c 309 s 928 expired September 1, 2000); 1999 c 268 s 5; (1999 c 268 s 4 expired September 1, 2000); 1999 c 94 s 4; (1999 c 94 ss 2, 3 expired September 1, 2000); 1998 c 341 s 708; 1997 c 218 s 5; 1996 c 262 s 4; prior: 1995 c 394 s 1; 1995 c 122 s 12; prior: 1994 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 601, approved November 2, 1993); 1993 sp.s. c 25 s 511; 1993 sp.s. c 8 s 1; 1993 c 500 s 6; 1993 c 492 s 473; 1993 c 445 s 4; 1993 c 329 s 2; 1993 c 4 s 9; 1992 c 235 s 4; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 57; 1990 2nd ex.s. c 1 s 204; 1989 c 419 s 12; 1985 c 57 s 51.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 168 s 13 and by 2024 c 210 s 5, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective dates—Findings—Intent—2024 c 210: See notes following RCW 43.79.484.

Effective dates—2024 c 168 ss 4-13: See note following RCW 41.05.155.

Effective date—2023 c 435 s 14: "Section 14 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 435 s 17.]

Effective date—2023 c 431 s 10: "Section 10 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 431 s 18.]

Intent—2023 c 431: See note following RCW 46.17.015.

Effective date—2023 c 389 s 10: "Section 10 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 389 s 12.]

Effective date—2023 c 377 s 7: "Section 7 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 377 s 12.]

Finding—2023 c 377: See note following RCW 47.56.902.

Effective date—2023 c 340 s 10: "Section 10 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 340 s 17.]

Short title—Conflict with federal requirements—2023 c 340: See notes following RCW 43.181.040.

Effective date—2023 c 110 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2023 c 110 s 16.]

Contingent effective date—Effective date—2023 c 73 ss 7 and 10: See note following RCW 41.24.030.

Finding—Intent—2023 c 73: See note following RCW 41.24.800.

Effective dates—2023 c 41: "(1) Except for sections 4 and 5 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023.

(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024.

(3) Section 5 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 6, 2023]." [ 2023 c 41 s 6.]

Effective date—2022 c 182 s 404: "Section 404 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2022 c 182 s 504.]

Intent—2022 c 182: See note following RCW 70A.65.240.

Effective date—2021 c 199 s 505: "Section 505 of this act takes effect July 1, 2024." [ 2021 c 199 s 609.]

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 148: See notes following RCW 77.12.170.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 103: See notes following RCW 28B.10.423.

Explanatory statement—2020 c 18: See note following RCW 43.79A.040.

Intent—Effective date—2019 c 421: See notes following RCW 47.10.896.

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2019 c 403: See notes following RCW 46.04.071.

Findings—2019 c 365: See note following RCW 43.330.532.

Effective date—2019 c 287: See note following RCW 82.29A.125.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 287: See note following RCW 28B.30.903.

Intent—2019 c 95: See note following RCW 70A.305.170.

Findings—Implementation—Effective date—2018 c 287: See notes following RCW 46.55.400.

Finding—Intent—2018 c 203: See note following RCW 28B.85.095.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.

Contingent expiration date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 107: "Section 107 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 429.]

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.

Contingent expiration date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 3: "Section 3 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 5.]

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 12: See note following RCW 47.01.480.

Contingent expiration date—2014 c 112 s 106: "Section 106 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2014 c 112 s 501.]

Contingent expiration date—2014 c 74 s 5: "Section 5 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2014 c 74 s 9.]

Contingent expiration date—2014 c 32 s 6: "Section 6 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2014 c 32 s 8.]

Contingent expiration date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 24: "Section 24 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 23 s 29.]

Finding—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 23: See note following RCW 46.09.442.

Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 23: See note following RCW 46.09.310.

Contingent expiration date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 15: "Section 15 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 17.]

Contingent expiration date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 15: "Section 15 of this act expires on the date the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 17.]

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2013 2nd sp.s. c 1: See notes following RCW 70A.305.020.

Contingent expiration date—2013 c 251 s 3: "Section 3 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 c 251 s 15.]

Residual balance of funds—Effective date—2013 c 251: See notes following RCW 41.06.280.

Contingent expiration date—2013 c 96 s 3: "Section 3 of this act expires if the requirements set out in section 7, chapter 36, Laws of 2012 are met." [ 2013 c 96 s 5.]

Effective date—2012 c 198: See note following RCW 70A.15.5110.

Finding—Intent—2012 c 83: See note following RCW 47.56.862.

Finding—Contingent effective date—Notice of certification and toll rate agreements—2012 c 36: See notes following RCW 47.56.810.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 16 ss 1-15: See note following RCW 47.60.530.

Purpose—Findings—Intent—Severability—Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 7: See RCW 74.48.005, 74.48.900, and 74.48.901.

Intent—2011 c 369: See note following RCW 47.56.880.

Effective date—2011 c 339: "Sections 1 through 4 and 6 through 38 of this act take effect September 1, 2011." [ 2011 c 339 s 39.]

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 9: See note following RCW 28A.650.035.

Intent—2010 c 222: See note following RCW 43.08.150.

Effective date—2010 c 162: See note following RCW 43.42.090.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Intent—Effective date—2009 c 472: See notes following RCW 47.56.870.

Effective date—2009 c 451 s 8: "Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 451 s 9.]

Expiration dates—2009 c 451 ss 2, 3, 5, 6, and 7: "(1) Sections 2, 3, 5, and 6 of this act expire June 30, 2016.

(2) Section 7 of this act expires July 1, 2009." [ 2009 c 451 s 10.]

Effective date—Intent—2009 c 451: See notes following RCW 43.325.030.

Effective date—2008 c 128 ss 17-20: See note following RCW 88.16.061.

Expiration dates—2008 c 106 ss 2 and 3: "(1) Section 2 of this act expires July 1, 2008.

(2) Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 106 s 5.]

Effective dates—2008 c 106 ss 3 and 4: "(1) Section 3 of this act takes effect July 1, 2008.

(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 106 s 6.]

Effective date—2007 c 513: "This act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2007 c 513 s 2.]

Contingent effective date—2007 c 484 ss 2-8: See note following RCW 43.79.495.

Short title—2007 c 356: See note following RCW 74.31.005.

Effective date—2006 c 337 s 11: "Section 11 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 337 s 14.]

Expiration date—2006 c 337 s 10: "Section 10 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 337 s 13.]

Effective date—2006 c 311 s 23: "Section 23 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 311 s 31.]

Expiration date—2006 c 311 s 22: "Section 22 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 311 s 30.]

Findings—2006 c 311: See note following RCW 36.120.020.

Expiration date—2006 c 171 s 9: "Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 171 s 14.]

Effective date—2006 c 171 ss 8 and 10: See note following RCW 42.56.270.

Expiration date—2006 c 56 s 9: "Section 9 of this act expires July 1, 2006." [ 2006 c 56 s 11.]

Effective dates—2006 c 56: See note following RCW 41.45.230.

Effective date—2006 c 6: See RCW 90.90.900.

Effective date—2005 c 514 s 1106: "Section 1106 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 514 s 1313.]

Part headings not law—Severability—2005 c 514: See notes following RCW 82.12.808.

Effective dates—2005 c 353: See note following RCW 71A.20.170.

Effective date—2005 c 339 s 23: "Section 23 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 339 s 25.]

Effective dates—2005 c 314 ss 110 and 201-206: See note following RCW 46.68.035.

Part headings not law—2005 c 314: See note following RCW 46.68.035.

Effective dates—2005 c 312 ss 6 and 8: "(1) Section 6 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2005.

(2) Section 8 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 312 s 11.]

Intent—Captions—2005 c 312: See notes following RCW 47.56.401.

Effective dates—2005 c 94: "(1) Section 1 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2005.

(2) Section 2 of this act takes effect July 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 94 s 3.]

Findings—Effective dates—2005 c 83: See notes following RCW 47.26.340.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Findings—2003 c 361: See note following RCW 82.38.030.

Effective dates—2003 c 361: See note following RCW 82.08.020.

Effective date—2003 c 150 ss 2 and 3: "Sections 2 and 3 of this act take effect July 1, 2005." [ 2003 c 150 s 4.]

Findings—Intent—2003 c 150; 2002 c 242: "The legislature finds that the community economic revitalization board plays a valuable and unique role in stimulating and diversifying local economies, attracting private investment, creating new jobs, and generating additional state and local tax revenues by investing in public facilities projects that result in new or expanded economic development. The legislature also finds that it is in the best interest of the state and local communities to secure a stable and dedicated source of funds for the community economic revitalization board. It is the intent of the legislature to establish an ongoing funding source for the community economic revitalization board that will be used exclusively to advance economic development infrastructure. This act provides a partial funding solution by directing that beginning July 1, 2005, the interest earnings generated by the public works assistance account shall be used to fund the community economic revitalization board's financial assistance programs. These funds are not for use other than for the stated purpose and goals of the community economic revitalization board." [ 2003 c 150 s 1; 2002 c 242 s 1.]

Effective date—2003 c 48: See note following RCW 29A.04.440.

Finding—Intent—2002 c 114: See RCW 47.46.011.

Captions not law—2002 c 114: See note following RCW 47.46.011.

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 608: "Section 608 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 611.]

Expiration date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 607: "Section 607 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 14 s 610.]

Severability—Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 14: See notes following RCW 47.04.210.

Effective date—2001 c 273 s 6: "Section 6 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 273 s 8.]

Expiration date—2001 c 273 s 5: "Section 5 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 273 s 7.]

Effective date—2001 c 141 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 141 s 6.]

Expiration date—2001 c 141 s 2: "Section 2 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 141 s 5.]

Purpose—2001 c 141: "This act is needed to comply with federal law, which is the source of funds in the drinking water assistance account, used to fund the Washington state drinking water loan program as part of the federal safe drinking water act." [ 2001 c 141 s 1.]

Effective date—2001 c 80 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 80 s 7.]

Expiration date—2001 c 80 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires March 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 80 s 6.]

Findings—Intent—2001 c 80: See note following RCW 43.70.040.

Expiration date—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 3 and 4: "Sections 3 and 4 of this act expire September 1, 2000." [ 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 37.]

Effective date—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 1-3 and 20: See note following RCW 82.08.020.

Effective dates—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 4-10: See note following RCW 43.89.010.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Expiration date—2000 c 79 ss 37 and 38: "Sections 37 and 38 of this act expire September 1, 2000." [ 2000 c 79 s 49.]

Effective dates—2000 c 79 ss 26, 38, and 39: See note following RCW 48.43.041.

Severability—2000 c 79: See note following RCW 48.04.010.

Effective date—1999 c 380: See RCW 43.99P.901.

Expiration date—1999 c 309 s 928: "Section 928 of this act expires September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 309 s 930.]

Effective dates—1999 c 309 ss 927-929, 931, and 1101-1902: See note following RCW 43.79.480.

Severability—1999 c 309: See note following RCW 41.06.152.

Effective date—1999 c 268 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 268 s 7.]

Expiration date—1999 c 268 s 4: "Section 4 of this act expires September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 268 s 6.]

Expiration date—1999 c 94 ss 2 and 3: "Sections 2 and 3 of this act expire September 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 94 s 36.]

Legislative finding—1999 c 94: "The legislature finds that a periodic review of the accounts and their uses is necessary. While creating new accounts may facilitate the implementation of legislative intent, the creation of too many accounts limits the effectiveness of performance-based budgeting. Too many accounts also limit the flexibility of the legislature to address emerging and changing issues in addition to creating administrative burdens for the responsible agencies. Accounts created for specific purposes may no longer be valid or needed. Accordingly, this act eliminates accounts that are not in use or are unneeded and consolidates accounts that are similar in nature." [ 1999 c 94 s 1.]

Effective dates—1999 c 94: "(1) Sections 1, 2, 5 through 24, 29 through 31, and 33 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 1999.

(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect September 1, 2000.

(3) Sections 32 and 37 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect June 30, 1999.

(4) Sections 3, 25 through 28, and 34 of this act take effect July 1, 2000." [ 1999 c 94 s 35.]

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Findings—Effective date—1997 c 218: See notes following RCW 70A.120.030.

Transportation infrastructure account—Highway infrastructure account—Finding—Intent—Purpose—1996 c 262: See RCW 82.44.195.

Effective date—1996 c 262: See note following RCW 82.44.190.

Effective date—1995 c 394: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 394 s 3.]

Declaration—Intent—Purpose—1995 c 122: See RCW 59.21.006.

Effective date—1995 c 122: See RCW 59.21.905.

Severability—Effective dates—Part headings, captions not law—1993 sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 82.04.230.

Findings—Intent—1993 sp.s. c 25: See note following RCW 82.45.010.

Effective date—Application—1993 sp.s. c 8: "This act shall take effect July 1, 1993, but shall not be effective for earnings on balances prior to July 1, 1993." [ 1993 sp.s. c 8 s 3.]

Finding—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 500: See notes following RCW 43.41.180.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.

Effective date—1993 c 329: See note following RCW 90.50A.020.

Legislative declaration—Effective date—1993 c 4: See notes following RCW 47.56.770.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Applicability—1990 2nd ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 82.14.050.

Severability—1990 2nd ex.s. c 1: See note following RCW 82.14.300.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.